Wyoming statutes. Title 33 Professions and Occupations
Article 2. General Provisions

§ 33-29-201.
Definitions.

As used in this act:

“Board” means the Wyoming board of professional engineers and professional land surveyors;

“Business entity” means a corporation, limited liability company, partnership, limited partnership, limited liability partnership or any other form of business except a sole proprietorship;

“Engineer intern” means an individual who is certified by the board as an engineer intern;

“Jurisdiction” means a licensing agency, including agencies outside of the United States;

“Land surveyor intern” means an individual who is certified by the board as a land surveyor intern;

“Licensee” means a professional engineer or professional land surveyor licensed by the board;

“Practice of professional engineering” means performing for others or offering to perform for others any “professional service” or “professional creative work” requiring engineering education, training and experience and special knowledge of mathematics, physics and engineering sciences. An individual performs “a professional service” or “professional creative work” in the practice of professional engineering if he:

Represents himself to be a professional engineer by sign, advertisement, letterhead, card, verbal claim or any other manner;

Quotes a fee for a professional engineering service;

Executes a contract or agreement for a professional engineering service;

Teaches upper division engineering design subjects as a professional engineer at a college or university;

Performs research investigations as a professional engineer;

Testifies as an expert in professional engineering; or

Holds himself out as able to perform or does perform, as a professional engineer, any similar service defined by board rule as the practice of professional engineering.

“Practice of professional land surveying” means performing for others or offering to perform for others “professional services” which involve the application of special knowledge or principles of mathematics and methods of measurement for the determination and preservation of land boundaries and for the determination of land features and forms. An individual performs a “professional service” in the practice of professional land surveying if he:

As a professional land surveyor, makes geometric measurements and gathers related information pertaining to the physical or legal features of the earth, improvements on the earth and the space above, on or below the earth;

Teaches, as a professional land surveyor, upper division university level land surveying design subjects;

Performs professional land surveying research as a professional land surveyor;

As a professional land surveyor, creates work product relating to land surveying such as graphics, data, maps, plans, reports and descriptions;

Represents himself to be a professional land surveyor by sign, advertisement, letterhead, card, verbal claim or any other way;

Testifies as an expert in professional land surveying; or

Holds himself out as able to perform or does perform, as a professional land surveyor, any similar service defined by board rule as professional land surveying.

“Professional engineer” means an individual who, by reason of intensive preparation in the use of mathematics, physics and engineering sciences including the principles and methods of engineering analysis and design, is qualified to practice professional engineering and is licensed under this act;

“Professional land surveyor” means an individual who by reason of specialized knowledge in the technique of measuring land, mathematics, physical and applied sciences, and legal requirements of surveying real property, is qualified to practice professional land surveying and is licensed under this act;

“Responsible charge” means the exercise of direct control or the personal supervision of engineering work by a professional engineer or surveying work by a professional land surveyor;

“This act” means W.S.

33-29-201

through

33-29-801

.

History.

2013 ch. 11, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.